src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k41_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    maður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: maður
    maður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: mann
    maður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: manni
    maður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: mans
    maður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: menn
    maður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: menn
    maður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: monnum
    maður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: manna
    maður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: maðurin
    maður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: mannin
    maður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: manninum
    maður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: mansins
    maður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: menninir
    maður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: menninar
    maður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: monnunum
    maður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: mannanna
